Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201654-7,105
Act, how cited; purpose of sections.

(1) Sections
54-7,105 to 54-7,110 shall be known and may be cited as the Exotic Animal
Auction or Exchange Venue Act.

(2) The purpose of the Exotic
Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act is to require an exotic animal auction
or exchange venue organizer to obtain a permit from the department before
conducting an exotic animal auction or exchange venue and to maintain
records for animal disease tracking purposes. Exotic animals sold at an exotic animal auction or exchange venue are
often foreign to the United States or to the State of Nebraska. These exotic
animals may carry dangerous, infectious, contagious, or otherwise transmissible
diseases, including foreign animal diseases, which could pose a threat to
Nebraska's livestock health and the livestock industry.

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 13.

Definitions, see section 54-701.03.

Department of Agriculture, State Veterinarian, powers, see sections 54-703 to 54-705.

Violations, penalties, see section 54-752.